Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 2

Rehearing, Review, and New Trial

27-2-101. Number of new trials in jury cases.

Not more than two (2) new trials shall be granted to the same party in an action at law, or upon the trial by jury of an issue of fact in equity.

Code 1858, § 3122 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 59); Shan., § 4850; Code 1932, § 8984; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-202.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 59 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 133; 20 Tenn. Juris., New Trials, §§ 2, 3.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Power of Trial Court to Grant Additur, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 753.